test/src/morphology/A-gavvra_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjektiv - gävvra: # -a-stammar
    gävvra+A+Sg+Nom: gävvra
    gävvra+A+Attr: gievras
    gävvra+A+Sg+Gen: gievra
    gävvra+A+Sg+Acc: gievrav
    gävvra+A+Sg+Ill: gävvraj
    gävvra+A+Sg+Ine: gievran
    gävvra+A+Sg+Ela: gievrast
    gävvra+A+Sg+Com: gievrajn
    gävvra+A+Pl+Nom: gievra
    gävvra+A+Pl+Gen: gievraj
    gävvra+A+Pl+Acc: gievrajt
    gävvra+A+Pl+Ill: gievrajda
    gävvra+A+Pl+Ine: gievrajn
    gävvra+A+Pl+Ela: gievrajst
    gävvra+A+Pl+Com: gievraj
    gävvra+A+Ess: gävvran
    gävvra+A+Abe: gievradak
